Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3527
Resolution; improvements; authorized.

Upon compliance with sections 18-3525 and 18-3526, the board of trustees or the administrator may by resolution order the contracting, making, reconstruction, purchase, or otherwise acquiring of any of the improvements provided for in the Community Improvement District Act.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 27.
April 17, 2026